Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 26. Qualified Education Loan Servicers.
§ 6.2-2613.
Investigations; examinations.

The Commission may, as often as it deems necessary, investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises, and records of any person licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter insofar as they pertain to any business for which a license is required by this chapter. Examinations of licensees shall be conducted at least once in each three-year period. In the course of such investigations and examinations, the owners, members, officers, directors, partners, trustees, and employees of the person being investigated or examined shall, upon demand of the person making such investigation or examination, afford full access to all premises, books, records, and information that the person making such investigation or examination deems necessary.

Examinations under this section may be conducted in conjunction with examinations to be performed by representatives of agencies of the federal government or another state. In lieu of conducting an examination, the Commission may accept the examination report of the federal government or another state.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2614.
Annual fees.

In order to defray the costs of their examination, supervision, and regulation, every licensee under this chapter shall pay an annual fee calculated in accordance with a schedule set by the Commission. All such fees shall be assessed on or before April 1 for every calendar year. All such fees shall be paid by the licensee to the State Treasurer on or before May 1 following each assessment.

In addition to the annual fee prescribed in subsection A, when it becomes necessary to examine or investigate the books and records of a licensee under this chapter at a location outside the Commonwealth, the licensee shall be liable for and shall pay to the Commission within 30 days of the presentation of an itemized statement the actual travel and reasonable living expenses incurred on account of its examination, supervision, and regulation or shall pay a reasonable per diem rate approved by the Commission.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2615.
Suspension or revocation of license.

The Commission may suspend or revoke any license issued under this chapter upon any of the following grounds:

Any ground for denial of a license under this chapter;

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or a violation of any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the licensee’s business;

A course of conduct consisting of the failure to perform written agreements with qualified education loan borrowers;

Failure to account for funds received or disbursed to the satisfaction of the person supplying or receiving qualified education loan funds;

Conviction of any felony or of a misdemeanor involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a judgment against the licensee involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a federal or state administrative order against the licensee for violation of any law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the licensee’s business;

Refusal to permit an investigation or examination by the Commission;

Failure to pay any fee or assessment imposed by this chapter; or

Failure to comply with any order of the Commission.

For the purposes of this section, acts of any senior officer, director, member, partner, trustee, or principal shall be deemed acts of the licensee.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2616.
Notice of proposed suspension or revocation.

The Commission shall not revoke or suspend the license of any licensee upon any of the grounds set forth in §

6.2-2615

until it has given the licensee (i) 21 days’ notice in writing of the reasons for the proposed revocation or suspension and (ii) an opportunity to introduce evidence and be heard. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of such licensee and shall state with particularity the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the licensee named therein may file with the Clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not suspend or revoke the license except based upon findings made at such hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Commission’s Rules.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2617.
Cease and desist orders.

If the Commission determines that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or violated any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of a licensee’s business, the Commission may, upon 21 days’ notice in writing, order such person to cease and desist from such practices and to comply with the provisions of this chapter and other applicable laws and regulations. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of such person or other address authorized under §

12.1-19.1

and shall state the grounds for the contemplated action.

Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person named therein may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not issue a cease and desist order except on the basis of findings made at the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Commission’s Rules. The Commission may enforce compliance with any order issued under this section by imposition and collection of such fines and penalties as may be prescribed by law.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2618.
Civil penalties.

The Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $2,500 upon any person who it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto or violated any other law or regulation applicable to conduct of the person’s business. For the purposes of this section, each separate violation shall be subject to the civil penalty prescribed in this section, and each day that an unlicensed person engages in the business of a qualified education loan servicer shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2619.
Private cause of action.

A qualified education loan servicer shall:

Comply with this chapter.

Comply with all applicable federal laws related to qualified education loan servicing, as from time to time amended, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.

Any person who suffers damage as a result of the failure of a qualified education loan servicer to comply with the requirements of subdivisions A 1 and 2 may bring an action against that qualified education loan servicer to recover or obtain any of the following:

Actual damages, but in no case shall the total award of damages be less than $500 per violation;

An order enjoining the methods, acts, or practices;

Restitution of property;

Punitive damages;

Attorney fees; and

Any other relief the court deems proper.

In addition to any other remedies provided by this section or otherwise provided by law, whenever it is proven by a preponderance of the evidence that a qualified education loan servicer has engaged in conduct that substantially interferes with a borrower’s right to (i) an alternative payment arrangement; (ii) loan forgiveness, cancellation, or discharge; or (iii) any other financial benefit as established under the terms of a borrower’s promissory note or under the Higher Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. § 1070a et seq., as amended from time to time, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the court shall award treble actual damages to the plaintiff, but in no case shall the award of damages be less than $1,500 per violation.

The remedies provided in this section are not intended to be the exclusive remedies available to the qualified education loan borrower, and a qualified education loan borrower shall not be required to exhaust any administrative remedies established pursuant to this chapter or any other applicable law prior to proceeding under this section.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2620.
Investigating and restraining prohibited acts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 59.1-199, whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in, or is engaging in, or is about to engage in any violation of this chapter, the Attorney General is empowered to issue a civil investigative demand. The provisions of § 59.1-9.10 shall apply mutatis mutandis to civil investigative demands issued pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the Attorney General may cause an action to be brought in the appropriate circuit court in the name of the Commonwealth to enjoin any violation of this chapter. The circuit court having jurisdiction may enjoin such violations notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law. In any action under this section, it shall not be necessary that damages be proved.

The circuit courts are authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of this chapter.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2621.
Violation of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 59.1-199, any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice in accordance with § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.).

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2622.
Regulations.

The Commission shall adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate to effect the purposes of this chapter. Before adopting any such regulation, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of its content and shall afford interested parties an opportunity to be heard, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”